src/morphology/stems/punctuation.lexc
! Divvun & Giellatekno - open source grammars for Sámi and other languages
! Copyright © 2000-2010 The University of Tromsø
! http://giellatekno.uit.no & http://divvun.no
!
! This program is free software; you can redistribute and/or modify
! this file under the terms of the GNU General Public License as published by
! the Free Software Foundation, either version 3 of the License, or
! (at your option) any later version. The GNU General Public License
! is found at http://www.gnu.org/licenses/gpl.html. It is
! also available in the file $GTHOME/LICENSE.txt.
!
! Other licensing options are available upon request, please contact
! giellatekno@hum.uit.no or divvun@samediggi.no

! ========================================================================== !
!!                           !!! Ojibwe punctuation                           
! ========================================================================== !


!! This is just a rudimentary file, to be extended.

LEXICON Punctuation 

+CLB:%,   # ;
+CLB:%.   # ;
+CLB:%:   # ;
+CLB:%;  # ;
+PUNCT:%-  # ;
+HYPH:%" # ;
+HYPH:%« # ;
+HYPH:%» # ;
+PAR:%[ # ;
+PAR:%] # ;
+PAR:%( # ;
+PAR:%) # ;
